Yamls/Pron-mod_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


Pronoun – мӧд: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Toinen, muu / Другой'
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: мӧд
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/моз: мӧдмоз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/моз+Comp: мӧдмозжык
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/кодь: мӧдкодь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Der/кодь+Comp: мӧдкодьжык
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Der/кодь+Comp+Cop+Pl: мӧдкодьжыкӧсь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [мӧдӧ, мӧдӧс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: мӧдлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: мӧдлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: мӧдлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: мӧдӧн 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: мӧдкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: мӧдтӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: мӧдла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: мӧдся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: мӧдын
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: мӧдісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: мӧдӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: мӧдлань
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: мӧдсянь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: мӧдӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: мӧдӧдз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: мӧдви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: мӧдланьын
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: мӧдланись
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: мӧдланьӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: мӧдланьсянь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: мӧдланьӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: мӧдланьӧдз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: мӧдланьви

    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: мӧдӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: мӧдӧс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: мӧдӧлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: мӧдӧлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: мӧдӧлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: мӧднам 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg1: мӧдӧкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg1: мӧдӧтӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: мӧдӧла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: мӧдӧся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: мӧдам
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: мӧдсим
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: мӧдам
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [мӧдӧлань, мӧдланям] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [мӧдӧсянь, мӧдсяням]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [мӧдӧттям, мӧдӧттим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [мӧдӧдззам, мӧдӧдззим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: мӧдӧви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [мӧдланям, мӧдӧланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [мӧдланьсим, мӧдӧланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [мӧдланям, мӧдӧланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [мӧдӧланьсянь, мӧдланьсяням]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [мӧдланьӧттям, мӧдланьӧттим, мӧдӧланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [мӧдланьӧдззам, мӧдланьӧдззим, мӧдӧланьӧдз]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: мӧдӧланьви

    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: мӧдыт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: мӧдтӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: мӧдытлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: мӧдытлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: мӧдытлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: мӧднат 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg2: мӧдыткӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg2: мӧдыттӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: мӧдытла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: мӧдытся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: мӧдат
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: мӧдсит
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: мӧдат
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [мӧдытлань, мӧдланят] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [мӧдытсянь, мӧдсянят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [мӧдӧттят, мӧдӧттит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [мӧдӧдззат, мӧдӧдззит]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: мӧдытви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [мӧдланят, мӧдытланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [мӧдланьсит, мӧдытланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [мӧдланят, мӧдытланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [мӧдытланьсянь, мӧдланьсянят]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [мӧдланьӧттят, мӧдланьӧттит, мӧдытланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [мӧдланьӧдззат, мӧдланьӧдззит, мӧдытланьӧдз]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: мӧдытланьви


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: мӧдыс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: мӧдсӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: мӧдыслӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: мӧдыслісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: мӧдыслӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: мӧднас 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg3: мӧдыскӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg3: мӧдыстӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: мӧдысла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: мӧдысся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: мӧдас
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: мӧдсис
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: мӧдас
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [мӧдыслань, мӧдланяс] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [мӧдыссянь, мӧдсяняс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [мӧдӧттяс, мӧдӧттис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [мӧдӧдззас, мӧдӧдззис]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: мӧдысви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [мӧдланяс, мӧдысланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [мӧдланьсис, мӧдысланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [мӧдланяс, мӧдысланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [мӧдысланьсянь, мӧдланьсяняс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [мӧдланьӧттяс, мӧдланьӧттис, мӧдысланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [мӧдланьӧдззас, мӧдланьӧдззис, мӧдысланьӧдз]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: мӧдысланьви

    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: мӧдным
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: мӧднымӧс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: мӧднымлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: мӧднымлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: мӧднымлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: мӧднаным 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl1: мӧднымкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl1: мӧднымтӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: мӧднымла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: мӧднымся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: мӧданым
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: мӧдсиным
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: мӧданым
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [мӧднымлань, мӧдланяным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [мӧднымсянь, мӧдсяняным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [мӧдӧттяным, мӧдӧттиным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [мӧдӧдззаным, мӧдӧдззиным] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: мӧднымви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [мӧдланяным, мӧднымланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [мӧдланьсиным, мӧднымланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [мӧдланяным, мӧднымланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [мӧднымланьсянь, мӧдланьсяняным]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [мӧдланьӧттяным, мӧдланьӧттиным, мӧднымланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [мӧдланьӧдззаным, мӧдланьӧдззиным, мӧднымланьӧдз] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: мӧднымланьви


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: мӧдныт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мӧднытӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мӧднытлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: мӧднытлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: мӧднытлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: мӧднаныт 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl2: мӧдныткӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl2: мӧдныттӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: мӧднытла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: мӧднытся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: мӧданыт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: мӧдсиныт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: мӧданыт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [мӧднытлань, мӧдланяныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [мӧднытсянь, мӧдсяняныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [мӧдӧттяныт, мӧдӧттиныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [мӧдӧдззаныт, мӧдӧдззиныт] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: мӧднытви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [мӧдланяныт, мӧднытланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [мӧдланьсиныт, мӧднытланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [мӧдланяныт, мӧднытланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [мӧднытланьсянь, мӧдланьсяняныт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [мӧдланьӧттяныт, мӧдланьӧттиныт, мӧднытланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [мӧдланьӧдззаныт, мӧдланьӧдззиныт, мӧднытланьӧдз] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: мӧднытланьви


    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мӧдныс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мӧднысӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мӧдныслӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: мӧдныслісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: мӧдныслӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: мӧднаныс 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl3: мӧдныскӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl3: мӧдныстӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: мӧднысла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: мӧднысся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: мӧданыс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: мӧдсиныс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: мӧданыс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [мӧдныслань, мӧдланяныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [мӧдныссянь, мӧдсяняныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [мӧдӧттяныс, мӧдӧттиныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [мӧдӧдззаныс, мӧдӧдззиныс] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: мӧднысви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [мӧдланяныс, мӧднысланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [мӧдланьсиныс, мӧднысланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [мӧдланяныс, мӧднысланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [мӧднысланьсянь, мӧдланьсяняныс]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [мӧдланьӧттяныс, мӧдланьӧттиныс, мӧднысланьӧт]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [мӧдланьӧдззаныс, мӧдланьӧдззиныс, мӧднысланьӧдз] 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: мӧднысланьви

    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: мӧддэз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: мӧддэзӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: мӧддэзлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl: мӧддэзлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat: мӧддэзлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins: мӧддэзӧн 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: мӧддэзкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car: мӧддэзтӧг
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns: мӧддэзла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr: мӧддэзся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: мӧддэзын
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: мӧддэзісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: мӧддэзӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr: мӧддэзлань
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr: мӧддэзсянь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl: мӧддэзӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI: мӧддэзӧдз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII: мӧддэзви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne: мӧддэзланьын
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEla: мӧддэзланись
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll: мӧддэзланьӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr: мӧддэзланьсянь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl: мӧддэзланьӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI: мӧддэзланьӧдз
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII: мӧддэзланьви

    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧс
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧлӧн
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧлісь
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧлӧ
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: мӧддэзнам 
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧкӧт
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧтӧг, мӧддэзтӧгьям]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧла
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧся
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: мӧддэзам
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [мӧддэсим, мӧддэзсим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: мӧддэзам
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧлань, мӧддэзланям]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧсянь, мӧддэзсяням]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧттям, мӧддэзӧттим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧдззам, мӧддэзӧдззим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧви
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: [мӧддэзланям, мӧддэзӧланьын]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg1: [мӧддэзланьсим, мӧддэзӧланись]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: [мӧддэзланям, мӧддэзӧланьӧ]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧланьсянь, мӧддэзланьсяням]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧланьӧт, мӧддэзланьӧттям, мӧддэзланьӧттим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [мӧддэзӧланьӧдз, мӧддэзланьӧдззам, мӧддэзланьӧдззим]
    мӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: мӧддэзӧланьви 
